Massachusetts, session 194th, H2794.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Paragraph (c) of section 102 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is amended by striking out in lines 34, 38 and 46 the
dollar amount “$13,000”, and inserting in place thereof the following dollar amount: - $18,000.
SECTION 2. Section 102 of Chapter 32 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by adding at the end thereof the following:- (h) Every member of the state employee
retirement system and the teacher’s retirement system who qualifies and has attained fifteen full
years of retirement as of June 30 of the prior fiscal year who receive a cost of living increase
shall receive an additional one hundred dollar benefit to said increase. Said one hundred dollar
benefit shall be granted only to members of the state retirement system and the teacher’s
retirement system whose total annual retirement benefit is less than the average annual
retirement benefit as determined by the retirement system’s most recent actuarial valuation and
retired with twenty or more years of creditable service, provided however, those members who
of 5

retired with a disability benefit under sections 6, 7 or 26 shall be eligible with less than twenty
years of creditable service. Any surviving beneficiary of a deceased member who would
otherwise be eligible for aforesaid additional benefit under this paragraph, including those
beneficiaries receiving a benefit under sections 9, 12 or 101, shall receive said additional benefit
if it is determined they are eligible by the retirement board in which they are a participant.
Every member of the state employee retirement system and the teacher’s retirement
system who has attained twenty full years of retirement as of June 30 of the prior fiscal year who
receive a cost of living increase shall receive an additional two hundred dollar benefit to said
increase. Said two hundred dollar benefit shall be granted only to members of the state retirement
system and the teacher’s retirement system whose total annual retirement benefit is less than the
average annual retirement benefit as determined by the retirement system’s most recent actuarial
valuation and retired with twenty or more years of creditable service. Any surviving beneficiary
of a deceased member who would otherwise be eligible for aforesaid additional benefit under
this paragraph, including those beneficiaries receiving a benefit under section 9, 12 or 101, shall
receive said additional benefit if it is determined they are eligible by the retirement board in
which they are a participant.
SECTION 3. Section 103 of Chapter 32 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by adding at the end thereof the following:- (k) Upon acceptance of the provisions of
this paragraph as provided in paragraph (n), every member of a retirement system other than the
state employees retirement system and the teachers’ retirement system, who has attained fifteen
full years of retirement as of June 30 of the prior fiscal year and receives a cost of living increase
pursuant to this section, shall receive an additional one hundred dollar benefit to said increase.
Said one hundred dollar benefit shall be granted only to members of a retirement system, other
of 5

than the state employees retirement system and the teachers’ retirement system, whose total
annual retirement benefit is less than the average annual retirement benefit as determined by their
retirement system’s most recent actuarial valuation and retired with twenty or more years of
creditable service, provided however, those members who retired with a disability benefit under
sections 6, 7 or 26 shall be eligible with less than twenty years of creditable service. Any
surviving beneficiary of a deceased member who would otherwise be eligible for aforesaid
additional benefit under this paragraph, including those beneficiaries receiving a benefit under
sections 9, 12 or 101, shall receive said additional benefit if it is determined they are eligible by
the retirement board in which they are a participant.
(l) Upon acceptance of the provisions of this paragraph as provided in paragraph (n),
every member of a retirement system other than the state employees retirement system and the
teachers’ retirement system, who has attained twenty full years of retirement as of June 30 of the
prior fiscal year and receives a cost of living increase pursuant to this section, shall receive an
additional two hundred dollar benefit to said increase. Said two hundred dollar benefit shall be
granted only to members of a retirement system other than the state employees retirement system
and the teachers’ retirement system whose total annual retirement benefit is less than the average
annual retirement benefit as determined by their retirement system’s most recent actuarial
valuation and retired with twenty or more years of creditable service, provided however, those
members who retired with a disability benefit under sections 6, 7 or 26 shall be eligible with less
than twenty years of creditable service. Any surviving beneficiary of a deceased member who
would otherwise be eligible for aforesaid additional benefit under this paragraph, including those
beneficiaries receiving a benefit under sections 9, 12 or 101, shall receive said additional benefit
if it is determined they are eligible by the retirement board in which they participate.
of 5

(m) Upon acceptance of the provisions of this paragraph as provided in paragraph (n),
every member of a retirement system other than the state employees retirement system and the
teachers’ retirement system, who has attained fifteen but not more than twenty full years of
retirement as of June 30 of the prior fiscal year and receives a cost of living increase pursuant to
this section, shall receive an additional one hundred dollar benefit and for those who has attained
more than twenty years of retirement as of June 30 of the prior fiscal year, shall receive an
additional two hundred dollar benefit to said increase. Such additional benefits shall be granted
only to members of a retirement system, other than the state employees retirement system and
the teachers’ retirement system, whose total annual retirement benefit is less than the average
annual retirement benefit as determined by their retirement system’s most recent actuarial
valuation and retired with twenty or more years of creditable service, provided however, those
members who retired with a disability benefit under sections 6, 7 or 26 shall be eligible with less
than twenty years of creditable service. Any surviving beneficiary of a deceased member who
would otherwise be eligible for aforesaid additional benefit under this paragraph, including those
beneficiaries receiving a benefit under sections 9, 12 or 101, shall receive said additional benefit
if it is determined they are eligible by the retirement board in which they are a participant.
(n) Acceptance of the provisions of paragraphs (k). (l) or (m) shall be by a majority vote
of the board of such system, subject to the approval of the legislative body. For the purpose of
this section, ''legislative body'' shall mean, in the case of a city, the city council in accordance
with its charter, in the case of a town, the town meeting, in the case of a district, the district
members, and, in the case of an authority, the governing body. In the case of a county or region,
acceptance shall be by the county or regional retirement board advisory council at a meeting
called for that purpose by the county or regional retirement board, Acceptance of this paragraph
of 5

shall be deemed to have occurred upon the filing of the certification of such vote with the
commission. A decision to accept the provisions of this paragraph may not be revoked.

of 5